test/src/morphology/V-tulla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tulla: # Verb 'to come / tulla' - full paradigm
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: tulen
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: tulet
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: tulou
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: tulemmo
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: tuletto
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: tullah
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tule
     tulla+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3: tulla

     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: tulin
     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: tulit
     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: tuli
     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: tulimmo
     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: tulitto
     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: tuldih
     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tulluh
     tulla+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: tuldih
     
     tulla+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: tulizin
     tulla+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: tulizit
     tulla+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3: [tulis, tuliz]
     tulla+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1: tulizimmo
     tulla+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: tulizitto
     tulla+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: tuldas

     tulla+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1: tulluzin
     tulla+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2: tulluzit
     tulla+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3: [tullus, tulluz]
     tulla+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1: tulluzimmo
     tulla+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2: tulluzitto
     tulla+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3: tuldannus

     tulla+V+Ind+ActPrfPrc: tulluh
     tulla+V+Ind+PssPrfPrc: tuldu
          
